Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.280

Violations—Liability.

(1) A licensee is liable for any conduct violating this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter committed by employees of the licensee.

(2) A licensee that commits willful misconduct in its supervision of its authorized delegate or willfully avoids knowledge of its authorized delegate's business activities may be subjected to administrative sanctions for any violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter by the licensee's authorized delegates.

(3) The responsible individual is responsible under the license and may be subjected to administrative sanctions for any violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter committed by the licensee or, if the responsible individual commits willful misconduct in supervising an authorized delegate or willfully avoids knowledge of an authorized delegate's business activities, violations committed by the licensee's authorized delegates.

[ 2003 c 287 s 30.]